Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-647
Right to recover damages; power of eminent domain; not limited.

Nothing in sections 46-638 to 46-650 shall be construed as limiting any right of an owner of an estate or interest in or concerning land to recover damage for any injury done to his or her land or to any water rights appurtenant thereto; nor shall sections 46-638 to 46-650 limit rights of condemnation which public water suppliers have under the laws of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1963, c. 276, § 10, p. 831;

Laws 1980, LB 643, § 4.

This section supplies a remedy of compensatory damages for a permittee's injury to another's land or water rights in contrast with injunctive relief available under common law. Sorensen v. Lower Niobrara Nat. Resources Dist., 221 Neb. 180, 376 N.W.2d 539 (1985).

Remedy in damages is given to landowners injured by granting of permit to use ground waters. Metropolitan Utilities Dist. v. Merritt Beach Co., 179 Neb. 783, 140 N.W.2d 626 (1966).